Utah statutes.
16-16-1302.   Proper plaintiff.
(1)  A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative
association may be maintained only by a person that:
(a)  is a member or a dissociated member at the time the action is commenced
and:
(i)  was a member when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or
(ii)  whose status as a member devolved upon the person by operation of law or
the organic rules from a person that was a member at the time of the conduct;
and
(b)  adequately represents the interests of the association.
(2)  If the sole plaintiff in a derivative action dies while the action is
pending, the court may permit another member who meets the requirements of
Subsection (1) to be substituted as plaintiff.
